Arkansas, session 2025, HB1695.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF ARKANSAS:

SECTION 1. Arkansas Code § 14-54-901 is amended to read as follows:
14-54-901. Municipal authority.
(a) Incorporated towns and cities of the first and second class are
empowered to order the owner of lots and other real property within their
towns or cities to cut weeds; to remove garbage, rubbish, and other unsightly
and unsanitary articles and things upon the property; and to eliminate, fill
up, or remove stagnant pools of water or any other unsanitary thing, place,
*JLL189*
04-08-2025 11:19:05 JLL189

As Engrossed: H3/17/25 S4/8/25 HB1695
or condition which might become a breeding place for mosquitoes, flies, and
germs harmful to the health of the community, after the town or city has
provided therefor by an ordinance to that effect.
(b) A city of the first class, a city of the second class, or an
incorporated town may order the removal or razing of, or remove or raze,
buildings or houses that in the opinion of the city council or town council
have become dilapidated, unsightly, unsafe, unsanitary, obnoxious, or
detrimental to the public welfare and shall provide by ordinance the manner
of removing and making these removals.

SECTION 2. Arkansas Code § 14-54-903(b), concerning the refusal of a
property owner to comply with a municipal notice related to neglected
property, is amended to read as follows:
(b)(1) If the owner or lienholder of any lot or other real property
within an incorporated town or city neglects or refuses to remove, abate, or
eliminate any condition under an ordinance passed by the city or town as
provided in § 14-54-901, after having been given seven (7) days' notice in
writing to do so, then the town or city may do whatever is necessary to
correct the condition and to charge the cost thereof to the owner of the lots
or other real property.
(2) A city or town incurring costs under subdivision (b)(1) of
this section may collect the costs from the owner of the lot or other real
property in the manner provided for the collection of a civil judgment.

SECTION 3. Arkansas Code § 14-54-903(c)(2), concerning the refusal of
a property owner to comply with a municipal notice related to neglected
property, is amended to read as follows:
(2) The town or city or town shall file the lien with the
circuit court county recorder no later than one hundred twenty (120) days
after the town or city completes the clean-up work on the property.

SECTION 4. Arkansas Code § 14-54-903(i), concerning the refusal of a
property owner to comply with a municipal notice related to neglected
property, is amended to read as follows:
(i) The city or town shall file its lien with the circuit clerk county
recorder no later than sixty (60) days after the governing body of the city
04-08-2025 11:19:05 JLL189

As Engrossed: H3/17/25 S4/8/25 HB1695
or town confirms the lien amount, or if the lien is appealed, within sixty
(60) days after the city or town wins on appeal.

SECTION 5. Arkansas Code § 14-54-903(j)(2), concerning the refusal of
a property owner to comply with a municipal notice related to neglected
property, is amended to read as follows:
(2) Priority status shall be awarded to the priority clean-up
lien with respect to any previously recorded lien if the court determines
that such lienholder has failed to exercise its rights to foreclose its lien
when the obligation it secures becomes in default or has failed to pay the
costs of work undertaken by a city or town that composes the clean-up lien.
However, the amount as to which the clean-up lien shall have priority shall
be the amount the court finds reasonable and is limited to:
(A) No more than one two thousand dollars ($1,000)
($2,000) for grass or weed cutting;
(B) No more than five ten thousand dollars ($5,000)
($10,000) to board and secure the property;
(C) No more than seven thousand five hundred dollars
($7,500) fifteen thousand dollars ($15,000) to demolish any structures on the
property; or
(D) No more than fifteen thirty thousand dollars ($15,000)
($30,000) for environmental remediation.

SECTION 6. Arkansas Code § 14-54-903, concerning the refusal of a
property owner to comply with a municipal notice related to neglected
property, is amended to add an additional subsection to read as follows:
(k) If an indebtedness filed as a lien under this section is paid and
satisfied, the city or town shall enter satisfaction of the lien on the
record in the office of the county recorder within thirty (30) days of the
satisfaction of the lien.

SECTION 7. Arkansas Code § 14-54-904(a)(1), concerning the manner of
enforcing a lien for clearance by municipality, is amended to read as
follows:
(1)(A) By an action for foreclosure in the circuit court by the
city or town, or if the city or town has established a land bank, by a land
04-08-2025 11:19:05 JLL189

As Engrossed: H3/17/25 S4/8/25 HB1695
bank that has been assigned the lien.
(B)(i) A city or town that has been granted a lien under
this subchapter may:
(a)(1) File an action for foreclosure under
this subdivision (a)(1) in the circuit court that has jurisdiction over the
property that is subject to the lien.
(2) An action for foreclosure under this
subdivision (a)(1) shall name all lienholders of record over which a city or
town claims the city or town has priority as parties to the foreclosure.
(3) If a lienholder is not named as a
party to a foreclosure under subdivision (a)(1)(B)(i)(a)(2) of this section,
the lien held by the lienholder shall remain on the property; and
(b) Petition for the circuit court to order
the sale of the property.
(ii)(a) If a city or town petitions a circuit court
for the sale of property under subdivision (a)(1)(B)(i) of this section, the
circuit court may order the property to be sold at a public sale.
(b) If a circuit court orders the sale of
property at a public sale under subdivision (a)(1)(B)(ii)(a) of this section,
the circuit court shall appoint a commissioner to oversee the sale of the
property.
(iii) A commissioner appointed under subdivision
(a)(1)(B)(ii)(b) of this section shall:
(a) Be responsible for conducting the public
sale of the property in accordance with the order of the circuit court and
any applicable laws; and
(b) Set the time and place of the public sale
at a date that is at least thirty (30) days after the circuit court ordered
the sale of the property.
(iv)(a) When a commissioner appointed under
subdivision (a)(1)(B)(ii) of this section has set the time and place of a
public sale under subdivision (a)(1)(B)(iii)(b) of this section, the city or
town that petitioned for the sale of the property under subdivision
(a)(1)(B)(i) of this section shall provide notice of the sale to the owner of
the property at the owner's last known address and any lienholders of record
at the address shown in the relevant land records of the time and place of
04-08-2025 11:19:05 JLL189

As Engrossed: H3/17/25 S4/8/25 HB1695
the public sale of the property.
(b) A city or town is not required to
notify a holder of an unrecorded lien or an unrecorded assignee of a
lienholder under this subdivision (a)(1)(B)(iv).
(c) The notice to an owner required under
subdivision (a)(1)(B)(iv)(a) of this section shall contain at least
(3) The notice to an owner required under
subdivision (a)(1)(B)(iii)(c)(1) of this section shall contain at least a
partial or abbreviated legal description of the property, the parcel number
for the property, the date of the public sale of the property, and a
statement that the property will be sold if not redeemed by the date of the
public sale; and
(d) Advertise the time and place of the public
sale of the property by publishing an advertisement in a newspaper of general
circulation in the county in which the property is located at least one (1)
time a week for two (2) consecutive weeks before the public sale.
(C) Proceeds from a public sale conducted under
subdivision (a)(1)(B) of this section shall be distributed based on the
priority of the liens on the property in accordance with the order of
disbursement issued by the circuit court.
(D) A lien that exists on property sold at a public sale
that complies with the requirements stated in this section and is conducted
under subdivision (a)(1)(B) of this section that is not satisfied after the
distributions provided under subdivision (a)(1)(C) of this section is
extinguished upon the completion of the public sale conducted under
subdivision (a)(1)(B) of this section; or

SECTION 8. Arkansas Code § 14-54-904(b)(1)(A), concerning the
enforcement of a lien for clearance by municipality, is amended to read as
follows:
(b)(1)(A)(i) In any situation in which a city of the first class or
city of the second class or town issues an order for the removal, repair to
return the structure to compliance with minimum building code standards, or
razing of a building or house under the provisions of 14-56-203 14-54-901(b)
and such order is not complied with by the owner of the building or house and
the city or town then removes, repairs, or razes the building or house, a
04-08-2025 11:19:05 JLL189

As Engrossed: H3/17/25 S4/8/25 HB1695
lien is granted and given against the real property for the cost of the owner
of the building or house is liable for all costs incurred by the city or town
related to the removal, repair, or razing of the building or house, including
without limitation any administrative, legal, filing, collection, and title
search costs.
(ii) A city or town may collect costs incurred under
this subsection from the owner of the building or house in any manner
provided for the collection of a civil judgment.
(iii) A city or town is granted a lien for the costs
incurred under this subsection, which shall be filed in the office of the
county recorder within one hundred twenty (120) days.
(iv) If an indebtedness filed as a lien under this
subsection is paid and satisfied, the city or town shall enter satisfaction
of the lien on the record in the office of the county recorder within thirty
(30) days of the satisfaction of the lien.

SECTION 9. Arkansas Code § 14-56-203 is repealed.
14-56-203. Removal or razing of buildings.
Cities of the first class, cities of the second class, and incorporated
towns may order the removal or razing of, or remove or raze, buildings or
houses that in the opinion of the city council or town council have become
dilapidated, unsightly, unsafe, unsanitary, obnoxious, or detrimental to the
public welfare and shall provide by ordinance the manner of removing and
making these removals.

SECTION 10. Arkansas Code § 26-37-205(b)(2)(A), concerning the
distribution of funds from the sale of tax-delinquent property, is amended to
read as follows:
(2)(A) After Except as provided in subdivision (b)(2)(E)(ii) of
this section, after payment is made to the Commissioner of State Lands
pursuant to subdivision (b)(1) of this section, the amount left in the
remaining funds shall be paid to the former owners of the tax-delinquent
parcel.

SECTION 11. Arkansas Code § 26-37-205(b)(2)(E), concerning the
distribution of funds from the sale of tax-delinquent property, is amended to
04-08-2025 11:19:05 JLL189

As Engrossed: H3/17/25 S4/8/25 HB1695
read as follows:
(E)(i) In the event of any dispute, claim, multiple claims
of ownership, controversy regarding the release of the funds, or claim not
expressly permitted under this section, the Commissioner of State Lands may
require the party or parties to provide a court order to resolve the issues
and to establish the party or parties entitled to the remaining funds.
(ii)(a) A city or town incorporated in this state
that possesses an unrecorded clean-up lien on property under § 14-54-903(c)
or § 14-54-904(b) may file a claim for the amount of the unrecorded lien in
circuit court.
(b) A claim for the amount of an unrecorded
lien under this subdivision (b)(2)(E)(ii) has priority status over other
unrecorded liens.
(c) A court that determines the validity of a
claim for the amount of an unrecorded lien under this subdivision
(b)(2)(E)(ii) shall issue an order for the amount to be distributed by the
Commissioner of State Lands to the city or town from the escrow fund
established under subdivision (a)(6) of this section before funds may be
released to the former owners of the property.

/s/J. Richardson















04-08-2025 11:19:05 JLL189